Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-701.5] Procurement statistics.
The state procurement office shall keep statistics on solicitations and awards
protested under section 103D-701 for the purpose of improving procurement
procedures. The statistics shall include information on protests involving
inadvertent errors. [L 2012, c 173, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next